hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-la-x-classic.tex
% title: Hyphenation patterns for classical Latin
% copyright: Copyright (C) 2019 Keno Wehr
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See http://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information.
%     These patterns are also suitable for medieval and modern Latin if German
%     or Slavic pronunciation is used.
%     See https://github.com/gregorio-project/hyphen-la/tree/master/doc for
%     documentation.
% source: https://github.com/gregorio-project/hyphen-la/tree/master/patterns/generation
% language:
%     name: Classical Latin
%     tag: la-x-classic
% version: 2.0 2019-07-03
% authors:
%  -
%     name: Claudio Beccari
%  -
%     name: Keno Wehr
%     contact: wehr (at) abgol.de
% licence:
%     name: MIT
%     url:  http://opensource.org/licenses/MIT
%     text: >
%           Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person
%           obtaining a copy of this software and associated documentation
%           files (the "Software"), to deal in the Software without
%           restriction, including without limitation the rights to use,
%           copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense, and/or
%           sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
%           Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following
%           conditions:
%
%           The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be
%           included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
%
%           THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND,
%           EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES
%           OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND
%           NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT
%           HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY,
%           WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
%           FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR
%           OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
% hyphenmins:
%     generation:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
%     typesetting:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
% texlive:
%     encoding: ec
%     babelname: classiclatin
%     message: Classical Latin hyphenation patterns
%     package: latin
% changes:
%  -
%     date: 2014-10-06
%     version: 1.2
%     author: Claudio Beccari
%  -
%     date: 2019-07-03
%     version: 2.0
%     author: Keno Wehr
%     description: patgen-based pattern generation; improved support of
%         compound words; do not hyphenate Roman numerals; support of v and j
%         spellings, ae/oe ligatures, accents, macrons, breves, and ties
%
\message{Hyphenation patterns for classical Latin, v. 2.0 2019-07-03}
%
% The following patgen parameters have been used:
%
%   1 1 | 1 3 | 2 3 1
%   2 2 | 2 4 | 1 5 1
%   3 3 | 3 5 | 1 6 1
%   4 4 | 4 6 | 1 7 1
%   5 5 | 5 11 | 1 8 1
%   6 6 | 6 11 | 1 9 1
%   7 7 | 7 11 | 1 9 1
%
\patterns{
.ab1
.aba2
.ab3a4u
.aba4v
.ab3áu
.ab3áv
.abe4
.ab3es
.abé2
.ab3és
.abi2
.ab3i4n
.ab3is
.ab3it
.abi4u
.abi4v
.abī2
.abī4n
.abī́4
.abí2
.ab3í4n
.ab3ís
.abí4t
.abo2
.abó2
.ab5us
.ab3ú
.ad3ā
.ad3á
.adǣ́4
.adǽ2
.ade4
.ad3es
.ad3ē2
.adḗ4
.adé2
.ad3ér
.ad3és
.ad3ib
.ad3i4c
.ad3ie
.ad3ié
.adi4m
.ad5i4n
.ad3i4q
.ad3is
.ad5i4t
.adi4u
.ad3i4v
.ad3ī4
.adī́4
.adí4c
.adí4m
.ad3í4n
.ad3í4q
.ad3ís
.adí4t
.ad3í4u
.ad3í4v
.ad6ora.
.ad6orane
.ad6oraq
.ad6oraue.
.ad6orave.
.ad5ṓro
.ad5ṓ6rō
.ad6ó6ra.
.adó4ro
.adú2
.ae2a
.ae2ă3
.ae4st
.ae5te
.ag2n
.aī3b
.aī́3b
.aí2
.aí3b
.am4b3ē
.am4bi.
.am4b5i4n
.am4b5i4q
.am6b5is.
.am6b5isn
.am6b5isq
.am6b5isu
.am6b5isv
.ambi6ue
.amb6iui.
.amb6iuin
.amb6iuiq
.amb6iuiu
.amb6iuín
.amb6iuíq
.amb6iuíu
.ambi6ve
.amb6ivi.
.amb6ivin
.amb6iviq
.amb6iviv
.amb6ivín
.amb6ivíq
.amb6ivív
.ambī4n
.ambī́6n
.am4b5í4n
.am4bí4q
.am4b5ís
.am6bí6ue
.am6bí6ve
.am4b3ú
.an6t5ea.
.ante5i4
.ante5í4
.as4ce
.as4cé
.as4ta
.as4tá
.as4te
.as4té
.as4to
.as4tō
.as4tó
.as6trar
.as6trat
.as4trā
.as6trár
.as6trás
.as4tru
.as4trū
.ate2
.atē2
.a͞e4ă
.a͞e4s5t
.a͡e4ă
.a͡e4s5t
.á͡e4s5
.āg2
.ā́2
.ā́g2
.ā́4l
.ā́4t
.ăbă2
.ăbă4u
.ăbă4v
.ăbĕ4
.ăbĕ́4
.ăbī2
.ăbī4q
.ăbī́4
.ăbĭ2
.ăb3ĭt
.ăbĭ́4
.ăbŏ́4
.ăd3ā
.ăd3á
.ădæ4
.ădǣ4
.ădǣ́4
.ădǽ4
.ăd3ē2
.ădḗ4
.ădĕ4
.ădĕ́4
.ăd3ī4
.ădī́4
.ăd3ĭē
.ăd3ĭĕ
.ăd3ĭī
.ădĭ4m
.ăd3ĭ4t
.ădĭ́4t
.ăd5ṓ6rō
.ăd5ṓrŏ
.ăd3ŭ́
.ăī3b
.ăī́3b
.ăm4b3ē
.ămbī4q
.ămbī́6q
.ăm4b5ŭ́
.ăs4pĭ
.ăs4tă
.ăs4tĭ
.ăs4tō
.ăs4trā
.ăs4trū
.ắ2
.ắb5ă4u
.ắb5ă4v
.ắb3ĕ4
.ắbĭ4
.ắb5ĭt
.ắb3ŏ
.ắ4c
.ắd3ē
.ắd3ĕ4
.ắd3ī
.ắd5ĭē
.ắd5ĭī
.ắd5ĭ4t
.ắ4g
.ắ4ĭ
.ắ4l
.ắ4r
.ắ4s
.ắs4tā
.ắs4tă
.ắs4tĕ
.ắs4tō
.ắ4t
.áb1
.ába2
.áb3a4u
.áb3a4v
.áb3e4
.ábi2
.áb3is
.áb3it
.áb3o
.ád1
.áde2
.ád3es
.ád3ē
.ádi2
.ád3ie
.ád3is
.ád3it
.ád3ī
.áes3
.áes5t
.ág4nit
.ám4bi.
.ám4b5is
.án4ter
.ás4ta
.ás4tā
.ás4te
.ás4to
.ás4tō
.ás4tru
.æs3t
.ǣs3t
.ǣ́2
.ǣ́4q
.ǣ́s3
.ǽs3
.ba3g
.ba6iane.
.ba6iáne.
.ba4ii
.ba4iī
.bā́3
.bá4iī
.bi3
.bĭ1
.bĭ3ĕ
.ca2i
.cá2i
.cen3s
.cēn3s
.ci6sta
.ci6sté
.co3i4
.co3í4
.com5ēs
.com5ḗs
.co4més
.co4n5i4c
.co4ní4c
.cŏ3ĭ
.cŏm5ēs
.cŏm5ḗs
.cŏm3ĕ
.cŏ4n5ĭ4c
.cŏ6n5ĭ́6c
.cŏ́3ĭ
.cŏ́4m3
.cŏ́mĭ4
.cŏ́6n5ĭ6c
.có3i
.có4mit
.cómi6te
.có4n5i4c
.de3d
.de4met
.des2
.de5u4ta
.de5u4tá
.de5utí
.dēs2
.dē3sc
.dē3sú
.dḗ3i
.dḗ5sum
.dĕ1
.dĕ3d
.dĕ3ŏ
.dé3s2
.di3gé
.di4r5e4m
.di4r5é4m
.dis6cendam
.dis6cendas
.dis6cendám
.dis6cendás
.dis6cendi
.dis6cendí
.dis6cendo.
.dis6cendon
.dis6cendoq
.dis6cendou
.dis6cendov
.dis6cendón
.dis6cendóq
.dis6cendóu
.dis6cendóv
.dis6céndam
.dis6céndas
.dis6cénde
.dis6céndi
.dis6céndo.
.di5s6tau
.di5s6tav
.dis4tá
.di5s4tī
.dī1
.dīs4t
.dĭ5s4tă
.dĭ5s4tī
.do3l
.dó3l
.ed2
.ed4i
.ed4o
.ed4u
.ei2
.er2e
.ere5x4
.et3i
.ex3ā
.ex3á
.ex3éq
.ex3i4
.ex3ī4
.exī́4
.ex3í4
.ex5ṓr
.ex3ón
.ex3u4
.exū2
.exū́4
.exú2
.ēs3tĭ
.ḗ2
.ĕd2
.ĕd4ĭ
.ĕt3ĭ
.ĕx3ā
.ĕx3ī4
.ĕxī́4
.ĕx3ĭ2
.ĕxĭ́4
.ĕx5ṓr
.ĕxū2
.ĕxū́4
.ĕx3ŭ
.ĕ́2
.ĕ́4c
.ĕ́4q
.ĕ́4t
.ĕ́t3ĭ
.ĕ́x3ī
.ĕ́x3ĭ4
.ĕ́x3ŭ
.ét3e2
.ét3i
.éx3eq
.éx3i2
.éx3u
.gé1
.hemi3
.hḗ3
.hi6ste
.hi6str
.hĭ6stĕ
.ho4s
.ibe3
.id3eo
.id3eō
.id3í
.id3ue
.ie3su
.ié3su
.ig2
.ig3ne
.ig3ni
.ig3nī
.ig3ní
.in1
.in3a4
.in3ā4
.inā́4
.iná4
.in3e4
.inē2
.inḗ4
.in3é2
.in3i4
.inī4
.inī́4
.in3í4
.in3o4
.inó4
.in3t
.inte6re6ri
.inte6re6rí
.inte6res
.inte6rés
.inte6ri.
.inte6riq
.inte6ris
.inte6rí6n
.inte6rí6q
.inte6rís
.inte6rí6t
.inté6re6ri
.inté6ri6te
.inté6ri6ti
.inté6ri6to.
.inté6ri6tō
.inu4d
.in3ue
.in3ui
.in3uī
.in3uí
.in3us
.inū́4
.inú4d
.io3s4
.io5su
.ió3s2
.is5ta
.is5tā
.is5te
.is5ti
.is5tí
.is3tr
.ī́2
.ī́4b
.ī́4m
.ī́4n
.ī́4q
.ī́4t
.ĭd3ĕō
.ĭg2
.ĭg3nĕ
.ĭg3nī
.ĭn1
.ĭn3ā4
.ĭnā́4
.ĭnḗ4
.ĭnĕ4
.ĭnĕ́4
.ĭnī4
.ĭnī́4
.ĭn3ĭ2
.ĭnĭ́4
.ĭntĕ6rĭt.
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tĕ
.ĭntĕ6rĭtn
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tō.
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tōn
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tōq
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tōu
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tōv
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓn
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓq
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓu
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓv
.ĭntĕ6rĭtq
.ĭntĕ6rĭtu
.ĭntĕ6rĭtv
.ĭntĕ6rĭ́6t
.ĭntĕ́6rĕ6rĭ
.ĭntĕ́6rĭ6tĕ
.ĭntĕ́6rĭ6tō
.ĭnū́4
.ĭn3ŭs
.ĭs5tā
.ĭs5tă
.ĭs5tĕ
.ĭs5tĭ
.ĭ́2
.ĭ́d5ĕō
.ĭ́4n
.ĭ́n3ĕ4
.ĭ́n3ĭ4
.ĭ́n5ŭĕ
.ĭ́n5ŭī
.ĭ́n5ŭō
.íd3eo
.íd3eō
.íd3ue
.ín1
.ín3e2
.ín3i2
.ín3t
.ín3ui
.jo3s4
.jo5su
.jó3s2
.li4g5n
.líg3n
.lí3t
.ma3ge
.magnæ6u
.magnæ6v
.magnǣ6u
.magnǣ6v
.magnǣ́6u
.magnǣ́6v
.magnǽ6u
.magnǽ6v
.mă3gĕ
.măgnæ6u
.măgnæ6v
.măgnǣ6u
.măgnǣ6v
.măgnǣ́6u
.măgnǣ́6v
.măgnǽ6u
.măgnǽ6v
.mĕ3ĭ
.mi6sta
.ne3q
.ne3s
.ne5s4c
.ne5ute
.ne5uté
.ne5u4ti
.ne3xo
.ne3xō
.nḗ3
.nĕ3xō
.né3s2
.né5ute
.no6ste
.nŏ6stĕ
.nu3d
.nū3d
.ob3a2
.obe4r
.ob3es
.ob3é2
.obi2
.ob3iī
.ob3i4n
.ob3iq
.ob3is
.obi4u
.obi4v
.ob3ī4
.obī́4
.obí4
.ob3ín
.ob3íq
.ob3ís
.obo2
.ob3ō
.obó4r
.ob3u
.oc4té
.os3t
.ṓ2
.ṓ4l
.ṓ4s
.ŏb3ī4
.ŏbī́4
.ŏb3ĭī
.ŏb3ō
.ŏc4t3ĕ
.ŏ́2
.ŏ́b3ĕ
.ŏ́b3ĭ
.ŏ́4l
.ŏ́4p
.ób3i
.œ́2
.pa4r5ui
.pa4r5uí
.pā2r3
.pá4rui
.pera4
.pe4r5an
.per5ar
.peras5
.pe4rā
.per5ār
.pe6ráeq
.peræ4q
.perǣ́4
.per5ǣ́q
.pe4rǽ4q
.pere4
.per5em
.pe4r5es
.pe4r5ē4
.perḗ4
.peré4
.pe4r5ém
.pe4r5és
.pe4ri.
.pe6riens
.per6iere.
.per6ierene
.per6iereq
.per6iereu
.per6ierev
.per6ieris
.per6ierís
.per6iēn
.per6iēre
.per6iḗn
.per6iḗre
.per6iére
.pe5rille
.pe5r6illi
.pe5rillí
.pe5rimin
.per6imini
.per6iminí
.per5imu
.pe5r6imur
.peri6mus
.pe5rimúr
.per5i6mús
.peri4n
.per5ine
.pe4r5i4q
.per6i6re.
.peri6rem.
.pe5r6iremi
.peri6remn
.peri6remq
.peri6remue
.pe5r6iremur
.peri6remus
.pe5r6iremúr
.peri6remús
.peri6remv
.per6i6rene
.peri6rent.
.peri6rentn
.peri6rentq
.peri6rentue
.pe5r6irentur
.pe5r6irentú
.peri6rentv
.per6i6req
.pe5r6irer
.peri6res
.peri6ret
.per6iretur
.per6iretú
.per6i6reu
.per6i6rev
.pe5r6irémi
.peri6rémn
.peri6rémq
.peri6rémue
.pe5r6irémur
.peri6rémus
.peri6rémv
.peri6réntn
.peri6réntq
.peri6réntue
.pe5r6iréntur
.peri6réntv
.pe5r6irér
.peri6rés
.peri6rét
.per6irétur
.pe5r6iri
.pe5r6irí
.pe6ris.
.pe6risn
.pe6risq
.pe6r5isse.
.pe6r5issem
.pe6r5issen
.pe6r5isseq
.pe6r5isses
.pe6r5isset
.pe6r5isseue
.pe6r5issev
.pe6r5issém
.pe6r5issén
.pe6r5issés
.pe6r5issét
.pe6r5isti
.pe6r5istí
.pe6risu
.pe6risv
.per5it.
.peri6ta
.peri6tā
.peri6tá
.per6i6tæ
.per6i6tǽ
.per6i6te
.peri6ti.
.peri6tin
.peri6tiq
.peri6tis.
.peri6tisn
.peri6tisq
.peri6tisu
.peri6tisv
.peri6tiue
.peri6tiv
.peri6tín
.peri6tíq
.peri6tísn
.peri6tísq
.peri6tísu
.peri6tísv
.peri6tíu
.peri6tív
.per5itn
.per6i6to.
.per6i6ton
.per6i6toq
.per6itor
.pe5ritor.
.pe5ritorn
.pe5ritorq
.pe5ritorue
.peri6torum
.peri6torú
.pe5ritorv
.per6i6tos
.peri6tot
.per6i6tou
.per6i6tov
.per6i6tón
.per6i6tóq
.per6itór
.pe5ritórn
.pe5ritórq
.pe5ritórue
.peri6tórum
.pe5ritórv
.per6i6tós
.peri6tót
.per6i6tóu
.per6i6tóv
.per5itq
.per6i6tu
.per7itue
.peri6tū
.per6i6tú
.per5itv
.peri4u
.per7iue
.per5i4v
.pe4rī.
.pe6r5ī6mus
.pe6r5ī6mús
.per5ī4n
.pe4r5ī4q
.pe6r6ī6re.
.pe6rī6rem
.pe6r6ī6rene
.pe6rī6rent.
.pe6rī6rentn
.pe6rī6rentq
.pe6rī6rentue
.per6īrentur
.per6īrentú
.pe6rī6rentv
.pe6r6ī6req
.per6īrer
.pe6rī6ret
.pe6r6ī6reu
.pe6r6ī6rev
.per6īrēmi
.per6īrēmur
.pe6rī6rēmus
.per6īrēmúr
.pe6rī6rēmús
.per6īrēr
.pe6rī6rēs
.pe6rī6rēt
.per6īrētu
.per6īrētú
.per6īrḗmi
.per6īrḗmur
.pe6rī6rḗmus
.per6īrḗr
.pe6rī6rḗs
.pe6rī6rḗt
.per6īrḗtu
.pe6rī6rém
.pe6rī6réntn
.pe6rī6réntq
.pe6rī6réntue
.per6īréntur
.pe6rī6réntv
.per6īrér
.pe6rī6rét
.per6īri
.per6īrī
.per6īrí
.pe4r5īs
.pe6rī6te
.pe6r5ī6tis.
.pe6r5ī6tisn
.pe6r5ī6tisq
.pe6r5ī6tisu
.pe6r5ī6tisv
.pe6r5ī6tísn
.pe6r5ī6tísq
.pe6r5ī6tísu
.pe6r5ī6tísv
.pe6rī6tō.
.pe6rī6tōn
.pe6rī6tōq
.pe6r5ī6tōt
.pe6rī6tōu
.pe6rī6tōv
.pe6rī6tṓn
.pe6rī6tṓq
.pe6r5ī6tṓt
.pe6rī6tṓu
.pe6rī6tṓv
.pe6rī6tur
.pe6rī6túr
.pe4r5ī4u
.pe4r5ī4v
.pe6r5ī́6mus
.pe6r5ī́6n
.pe6r5ī́6q
.pe6r6ī́6re.
.pe6rī́6rem
.pe6rī́6ren
.per6ī́rene
.pe6r6ī́6req
.per6ī́rer
.pe6rī́6ret
.pe6r6ī́6reu
.pe6r6ī́6rev
.pe6rī́6rē
.per6ī́ri
.per6ī́rī
.pe6rī́s
.pe6rī́6te
.pe6r5ī́6tis
.pe6rī́6tō.
.pe6rī́6tur
.pe6rī́6u
.pe6rī́6v
.pe4ríe
.pe5ríl
.per6ímin
.pe6r5í6mus
.perí4n
.pe6r5íne
.pe4r5í4q
.pe6r6í6re.
.pe6rí6rem
.pe6rí6ren
.per6írene
.pe6r6í6req
.per6írer
.pe6rí6res
.pe6rí6ret
.pe6r6í6reu
.pe6r6í6rev
.per6íri
.pe6rísn
.pe6rísq
.pe6r5íss
.pe6r5ísti
.pe6rísu
.pe6rísv
.pe6rí6tan
.pe6rí6taq
.pe6rí6tau
.pe6rí6tav
.pe6rí6te
.pe6rí6tis
.pe6r5ítn
.pe6rí6to.
.pe6r5ítq
.pe6r5ítue
.pe6rítur
.pe6r5ítv
.pe4rí4u
.pe4rí4v
.per5os
.per3ō
.pe4rór
.pe4rós
.pē4nī
.pḗ3i
.pĕ4r3ā
.pĕ4r3ă
.pĕrăs5
.pĕ6r5áeq
.pĕræ4
.pĕrǣ4
.pĕrǣ́4
.pĕr5ǣ́q
.pĕrǽ4
.pĕ4r5ǽq
.pĕ4r5ē4
.pĕrḗ4
.pĕ4rĕā
.pĕ4rĕă
.pĕ4r5ĕm
.pĕ4r5ĕō
.pĕ6r5ĕ́m
.pĕ4rī.
.pĕ6r5ī6mŭs
.pĕ6r5ī6mŭ́s
.pĕr5ī4n
.pĕ4r5ī4q
.pĕ6r5ī6rēmŭs
.pĕ6r5ī6rēmŭ́s
.pĕ6r5ī6rēs
.pĕ6rī6rēt
.pĕr5īrētĭ
.pĕ6r5ī6rḗmŭs
.pĕ6r5ī6rḗs
.pĕ6rī6rḗt
.pĕr5īrḗtĭ
.pĕ6rī6rĕ.
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕm
.pĕ6rī6rĕnĕ
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕnt.
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕntn
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕntq
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕntu
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕntv
.pĕ6rī6rĕq
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕt
.pĕ6rī6rĕu
.pĕ6rī6rĕv
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́m
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́ntn
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́ntq
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́ntu
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́ntv
.pĕ6r5ī6rĕ́t
.pĕ4r5īs
.pĕ6rī6tĕ
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭs.
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭsn
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭsq
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭsu
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭsv
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭ́sn
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭ́sq
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭ́su
.pĕ6r5ī6tĭ́sv
.pĕ6rī6tō.
.pĕ6rī6tōn
.pĕ6rī6tōq
.pĕ6r5ī6tōt
.pĕ6rī6tōu
.pĕ6rī6tōv
.pĕ6rī6tṓn
.pĕ6rī6tṓq
.pĕ6r5ī6tṓt
.pĕ6rī6tṓu
.pĕ6rī6tṓv
.pĕ6rī6tŭr
.pĕ6rī6tŭ́r
.pĕ4r5ī4u
.pĕ4r5ī4v
.pĕ6r5ī́6mŭs
.pĕ6r5ī́6n
.pĕ6r5ī́6q
.pĕ6r5ī́6rē
.pĕ6rī́6rĕ.
.pĕ6r5ī́6rĕm
.pĕ6rī́6rĕn
.pĕr5ī́rĕnt
.pĕ6rī́6rĕq
.pĕ6r5ī́6rĕt
.pĕ6rī́6rĕu
.pĕ6rī́6rĕv
.pĕ6r5ī́s
.pĕ6rī́6tĕ
.pĕ6r5ī́6tĭs
.pĕ6rī́6tō.
.pĕ6rī́6tŭr
.pĕ6r5ī́6u
.pĕ6r5ī́6v
.pĕ6rĭēn
